North Dakota statutes. TITLE 40 Municipal Government
CHAPTER 40-53.2 Consolidation of Cities

40-53.2-01.
Legislative intent on city consolidation.

The legislative assembly recognizes that a viable government capable of providing essential services is necessary to the general welfare of the citizens of every city in this state. The legislative assembly further recognizes that some cities have become and will continue to become incapable of providing adequate services to their citizens and that a process is necessary to allow these dysfunctional cities to consolidate with other nearby cities in order to better serve the people of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 424, § 1.

40-53.2-02.
Consolidation — Resolution or petition — Election.

The governing body of any city may, by resolution, or shall, upon petition by ten percent of the number of qualified electors of the city who voted for governor at the last general election at which a governor was elected, place on the ballot at the next general election to be held in that city the following question:

Shall the city governing body appoint a committee from its membership to meet with members of the governing board of the city of , as a municipal consolidation review commission, to draft a proposal for consolidating the city of with the city of ?

Click to view

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 424, § 2; 1985, ch. 235, § 92.

40-53.2-03.
Municipal consolidation review commission.

Upon passage by a simple majority of the votes cast on the question in each of the cities seeking consolidation in the manner provided by section 40-53.2-02, the governing body of each of the cities seeking consolidation shall appoint an equal number of the members of each governing body who shall convene as the municipal consolidation review commission to make a finding as to whether or not there is sufficient reason to further consider consolidation of the cities seeking consolidation. If the commission finds insufficient reason, no further consideration shall be given to the matter of consolidation of the cities. If the commission finds sufficient reason for consolidation, it shall develop a recommended plan of consolidation, holding such hearings on the plan as it deems appropriate. The commission shall submit its recommended plan to the voters of both cities. Upon receiving a majority affirmative vote of the electors of each city, voting on the question at a special election or any regular election, the review commission’s recommended plan shall become effective on July first of the next year.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 424, § 3; 1997, ch. 108, § 30.